bot_num_new.lexd
PATTERNS
MilEnd|(Mil? CentEnd|(Cent? DecEnd|(Dec? One|Basic)))

PATTERN MilEnd
Mil_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem MilSuffix) CardSuffix

PATTERN Mil
Mil_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem MilSuffix) CelatSuffix

PATTERN CentEnd
Cent_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem CentSuffix) CardSuffix

PATTERN Cent
Cent_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem CentSuffix) CelatSuffix

PATTERN DecEnd
Dec_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem DecSuffix) CardSuffix

PATTERN Dec
Dec_NumStem|(Basic_NumStem DecSuffix) CompSuffix

PATTERN One
One_NumStem One_CardSuffix ClassMarker

PATTERN Basic
Basic_NumStem CardSuffix



LEXICON ClassMarker
<m>:w
<f>:j
<n>:b

LEXICON One_CardSuffix
<card>:

LEXICON CardSuffix
<card>:da

LEXICON DecSuffix
*10:c'ali

LEXICON CentSuffix
*100:bešun

LEXICON MilSuffix
*1000:azaru

LEXICON CompSuffix
+:ɬi

LEXICON CelatSuffix
+:č'uku

LEXICON One_NumStem
1:ce

LEXICON Basic_NumStem
2:k'e
3:habu
4:buʁu
5:ištu
6:inƛi
7:haƛ'u
8:biƛ'i
9:hač'a

LEXICON Dec_NumStem
10:hac'a

LEXICON Cent_NumStem
100:bešunu

LEXICON Mil_NumStem
1000:azaru
